ctranslate-ol/frontend/dictionaries/dsb_DE.aff
FLAG num
SFX 246 Y 10
SFX 246 0 e .
SFX 246 0 ej .
SFX 246 0 eje .
SFX 246 0 eju .
SFX 246 0 en .
SFX 246 0 o .
SFX 246 0 ogo .
SFX 246 0 om .
SFX 246 0 omu .
SFX 246 0 u .
SFX 247 Y 7
SFX 247 0 ich .
SFX 247 0 im .
SFX 247 0 imi .
SFX 247 0 o .
SFX 247 0 och .
SFX 247 0 om .
SFX 247 0 omi .
SFX 248 Y 7
SFX 248 0 ich .
SFX 248 0 im .
SFX 248 0 imi .
SFX 248 0 o .
SFX 248 0 och .
SFX 248 0 om .
SFX 248 0 omi .
SFX 249 Y 8
SFX 249 0 a .
SFX 249 0 ich .
SFX 249 0 im .
SFX 249 0 imi .
SFX 249 0 o .
SFX 249 0 och .
SFX 249 0 om .
SFX 249 0 omi .
SFX 250 Y 8
SFX 250 0 i .
SFX 250 0 ich .
SFX 250 0 im .
SFX 250 0 imi .
SFX 250 0 o .
SFX 250 0 och .
SFX 250 0 om .
SFX 250 0 omi .
SFX 251 Y 8
SFX 251 0 e .
SFX 251 0 ich .
SFX 251 0 im .
SFX 251 0 imi .
SFX 251 0 o .
SFX 251 0 och .
SFX 251 0 om .
SFX 251 0 omi .
SFX 252 Y 9
SFX 252 0 ach .
SFX 252 0 am .
SFX 252 0 ami .
SFX 252 0 mej .
SFX 252 0 my .
SFX 252 0 ow .
SFX 252 0 tej .
SFX 252 0 y .
SFX 252 0 śo .
SFX 253 Y 37
SFX 253 0 a .
SFX 253 0 ach .
SFX 253 0 achmej .
SFX 253 0 achmy .
SFX 253 0 achu .
SFX 253 0 am .
SFX 253 0 ami .
SFX 253 0 ašo .
SFX 253 0 aštej .
SFX 253 0 ašćo .
SFX 253 0 e .
SFX 253 0 ego .
SFX 253 0 ej .
SFX 253 0 eje .
SFX 253 0 eju .
SFX 253 0 em .
SFX 253 0 emu .
SFX 253 0 mej .
SFX 253 0 my .
SFX 253 0 oju .
SFX 253 0 om .
SFX 253 0 oma .
SFX 253 0 ow .
SFX 253 0 owu .
SFX 253 0 tej .
SFX 253 0 u .
SFX 253 0 y .
SFX 253 0 ych .
SFX 253 0 ym .
SFX 253 0 yma .
SFX 253 0 ymej .
SFX 253 0 ymi .
SFX 253 0 ymy .
SFX 253 0 ytej .
SFX 253 0 yśo .
SFX 253 0 yš .
SFX 253 0 ćo .
SFX 254 Y 26
SFX 254 0 e .
SFX 254 0 ech .
SFX 254 0 echmej .
SFX 254 0 echmy .
SFX 254 0 echu .
SFX 254 0 eštej .
SFX 254 0 ešćo .
SFX 254 0 ijo .
SFX 254 0 ijom .
SFX 254 0 ijomej .
SFX 254 0 ijomy .
SFX 254 0 ijotej .
SFX 254 0 ijośo .
SFX 254 0 ijoš .
SFX 254 0 iju .
SFX 254 0 mej .
SFX 254 0 my .
SFX 254 0 o .
SFX 254 0 om .
SFX 254 0 omej .
SFX 254 0 omy .
SFX 254 0 otej .
SFX 254 0 ośo .
SFX 254 0 oš .
SFX 254 0 tej .
SFX 254 0 ćo .
SFX 255 Y 7
SFX 255 0 ach .
SFX 255 0 am .
SFX 255 0 ow .
SFX 255 0 owu .
SFX 255 0 y .
SFX 255 0 yma .
SFX 255 0 ymi .
SFX 256 Y 7
SFX 256 0 ach .
SFX 256 0 am .
SFX 256 0 ow .
SFX 256 0 owu .
SFX 256 0 y .
SFX 256 0 yma .
SFX 256 0 ymi .
SFX 257 Y 10
SFX 257 0 i .
SFX 257 0 ijo .
SFX 257 0 ijom .
SFX 257 0 ijomej .
SFX 257 0 ijomy .
SFX 257 0 ijotej .
SFX 257 0 ijośo .
SFX 257 0 ijoš .
SFX 257 0 iju .
SFX 257 0 im .
SFX 258 Y 25
SFX 258 0 a .
SFX 258 0 ach .
SFX 258 0 achmej .
SFX 258 0 achmy .
SFX 258 0 achu .
SFX 258 0 am .
SFX 258 0 ami .
SFX 258 0 ašo .
SFX 258 0 aštej .
SFX 258 0 ašćo .
SFX 258 0 e .
SFX 258 0 i .
SFX 258 0 im .
SFX 258 0 imej .
SFX 258 0 imy .
SFX 258 0 itej .
SFX 258 0 iśo .
SFX 258 0 iš .
SFX 258 0 o .
SFX 258 0 oju .
SFX 258 0 om .
SFX 258 0 oma .
SFX 258 0 ow .
SFX 258 0 owu .
SFX 258 0 u .
SFX 259 Y 24
SFX 259 0 a .
SFX 259 0 ach .
SFX 259 0 achmej .
SFX 259 0 achmy .
SFX 259 0 achu .
SFX 259 0 am .
SFX 259 0 ami .
SFX 259 0 ašo .
SFX 259 0 aštej .
SFX 259 0 ašćo .
SFX 259 0 e .
SFX 259 0 i .
SFX 259 0 im .
SFX 259 0 imej .
SFX 259 0 imy .
SFX 259 0 itej .
SFX 259 0 iśo .
SFX 259 0 iš .
SFX 259 0 oju .
SFX 259 0 om .
SFX 259 0 oma .
SFX 259 0 ow .
SFX 259 0 owu .
SFX 259 0 u .
SFX 260 Y 5
SFX 260 0 j .
SFX 260 0 jmej .
SFX 260 0 jmy .
SFX 260 0 jtej .
SFX 260 0 jśo .
SFX 261 Y 5
SFX 261 0 j .
SFX 261 0 jmej .
SFX 261 0 jmy .
SFX 261 0 jtej .
SFX 261 0 jśo .
SFX 262 Y 27
SFX 262 0 ach .
SFX 262 0 achmej .
SFX 262 0 achmy .
SFX 262 0 achu .
SFX 262 0 ašo .
SFX 262 0 aštej .
SFX 262 0 ašćo .
SFX 262 0 e .
SFX 262 0 mej .
SFX 262 0 my .
SFX 262 0 tej .
SFX 262 0 y .
SFX 262 0 yjo .
SFX 262 0 yjom .
SFX 262 0 yjomej .
SFX 262 0 yjomy .
SFX 262 0 yjotej .
SFX 262 0 yjośo .
SFX 262 0 yjoš .
SFX 262 0 yju .
SFX 262 0 ym .
SFX 262 0 ymej .
SFX 262 0 ymy .
SFX 262 0 ytej .
SFX 262 0 yśo .
SFX 262 0 yš .
SFX 262 0 ćo .
SFX 263 Y 23
SFX 263 0 a .
SFX 263 0 ach .
SFX 263 0 am .
SFX 263 0 ami .
SFX 263 0 ch .
SFX 263 0 chmej .
SFX 263 0 chmy .
SFX 263 0 chu .
SFX 263 0 e .
SFX 263 0 m .
SFX 263 0 mej .
SFX 263 0 my .
SFX 263 0 oju .
SFX 263 0 om .
SFX 263 0 oma .
SFX 263 0 ow .
SFX 263 0 owu .
SFX 263 0 tej .
SFX 263 0 u .
SFX 263 0 śo .
SFX 263 0 š .
SFX 263 0 štej .
SFX 263 0 šćo .
SFX 264 Y 21
SFX 264 0 a .
SFX 264 0 ach .
SFX 264 0 am .
SFX 264 0 ami .
SFX 264 0 e .
SFX 264 0 o .
SFX 264 0 om .
SFX 264 0 oma .
SFX 264 0 omej .
SFX 264 0 omy .
SFX 264 0 otej .
SFX 264 0 ow .
SFX 264 0 owu .
SFX 264 0 ośo .
SFX 264 0 oš .
SFX 264 0 u .
SFX 264 0 y .
SFX 264 0 ymej .
SFX 264 0 ymy .
SFX 264 0 ytej .
SFX 264 0 yśo .
SFX 265 Y 21
SFX 265 0 a .
SFX 265 0 ach .
SFX 265 0 am .
SFX 265 0 ami .
SFX 265 0 e .
SFX 265 0 mej .
SFX 265 0 my .
SFX 265 0 o .
SFX 265 0 oju .
SFX 265 0 om .
SFX 265 0 oma .
SFX 265 0 omej .
SFX 265 0 omy .
SFX 265 0 otej .
SFX 265 0 ow .
SFX 265 0 owu .
SFX 265 0 ośo .
SFX 265 0 oš .
SFX 265 0 tej .
SFX 265 0 u .
SFX 265 0 ćo .
SFX 266 Y 22
SFX 266 0 a .
SFX 266 0 ach .
SFX 266 0 am .
SFX 266 0 ami .
SFX 266 0 e .
SFX 266 0 i .
SFX 266 0 mej .
SFX 266 0 my .
SFX 266 0 o .
SFX 266 0 oju .
SFX 266 0 om .
SFX 266 0 oma .
SFX 266 0 omej .
SFX 266 0 omy .
SFX 266 0 otej .
SFX 266 0 ow .
SFX 266 0 owu .
SFX 266 0 ośo .
SFX 266 0 oš .
SFX 266 0 tej .
SFX 266 0 u .
SFX 266 0 śo .
SFX 267 Y 13
SFX 267 0 e .
SFX 267 0 mej .
SFX 267 0 my .
SFX 267 0 tej .
SFX 267 0 yjo .
SFX 267 0 yjom .
SFX 267 0 yjomej .
SFX 267 0 yjomy .
SFX 267 0 yjotej .
SFX 267 0 yjośo .
SFX 267 0 yjoš .
SFX 267 0 yju .
SFX 267 0 ćo .
SFX 268 Y 12
SFX 268 0 mej .
SFX 268 0 my .
SFX 268 0 tej .
SFX 268 0 yjo .
SFX 268 0 yjom .
SFX 268 0 yjomej .
SFX 268 0 yjomy .
SFX 268 0 yjotej .
SFX 268 0 yjośo .
SFX 268 0 yjoš .
SFX 268 0 yju .
SFX 268 0 ćo .
SFX 269 Y 12
SFX 269 0 mej .
SFX 269 0 my .
SFX 269 0 tej .
SFX 269 0 yjo .
SFX 269 0 yjom .
SFX 269 0 yjomej .
SFX 269 0 yjomy .
SFX 269 0 yjotej .
SFX 269 0 yjośo .
SFX 269 0 yjoš .
SFX 269 0 yju .
SFX 269 0 śo .
SFX 270 Y 22
SFX 270 0 ach .
SFX 270 0 achmej .
SFX 270 0 achmy .
SFX 270 0 achu .
SFX 270 0 ašo .
SFX 270 0 aštej .
SFX 270 0 ašćo .
SFX 270 0 e .
SFX 270 0 mej .
SFX 270 0 my .
SFX 270 0 ogo .
SFX 270 0 om .
SFX 270 0 omu .
SFX 270 0 tej .
SFX 270 0 y .
SFX 270 0 ym .
SFX 270 0 ymej .
SFX 270 0 ymy .
SFX 270 0 ytej .
SFX 270 0 yśo .
SFX 270 0 yš .
SFX 270 0 ćo .
SFX 271 Y 8
SFX 271 0 i .
SFX 271 0 im .
SFX 271 0 imej .
SFX 271 0 imi .
SFX 271 0 imy .
SFX 271 0 itej .
SFX 271 0 iśo .
SFX 271 0 iš .
SFX 272 Y 9
SFX 272 0 i .
SFX 272 0 iju .
SFX 272 0 im .
SFX 272 0 imej .
SFX 272 0 imy .
SFX 272 0 itej .
SFX 272 0 iśo .
SFX 272 0 iš .
SFX 272 0 ě .
SFX 273 Y 10
SFX 273 0 a .
SFX 273 0 e .
SFX 273 0 ej .
SFX 273 0 eje .
SFX 273 0 eju .
SFX 273 0 ich .
SFX 273 0 im .
SFX 273 0 ima .
SFX 273 0 imi .
SFX 273 0 u .
SFX 274 Y 9
SFX 274 0 a .
SFX 274 0 ach .
SFX 274 0 am .
SFX 274 0 ami .
SFX 274 0 eju .
SFX 274 0 oma .
SFX 274 0 ow .
SFX 274 0 owu .
SFX 274 0 u .
SFX 275 Y 10
SFX 275 0 a .
SFX 275 0 ach .
SFX 275 0 am .
SFX 275 0 ami .
SFX 275 0 e .
SFX 275 0 eju .
SFX 275 0 oma .
SFX 275 0 ow .
SFX 275 0 owu .
SFX 275 0 u .
SFX 276 Y 12
SFX 276 0 a .
SFX 276 0 ach .
SFX 276 0 am .
SFX 276 0 ami .
SFX 276 0 e .
SFX 276 0 eju .
SFX 276 0 i .
SFX 276 0 im .
SFX 276 0 oma .
SFX 276 0 ow .
SFX 276 0 owu .
SFX 276 0 u .
SFX 277 Y 12
SFX 277 0 a .
SFX 277 0 ach .
SFX 277 0 am .
SFX 277 0 ami .
SFX 277 0 e .
SFX 277 0 eju .
SFX 277 0 i .
SFX 277 0 im .
SFX 277 0 oma .
SFX 277 0 ow .
SFX 277 0 owu .
SFX 277 0 u .
SFX 278 Y 11
SFX 278 0 a .
SFX 278 0 ach .
SFX 278 0 am .
SFX 278 0 ami .
SFX 278 0 e .
SFX 278 0 eju .
SFX 278 0 om .
SFX 278 0 oma .
SFX 278 0 ow .
SFX 278 0 owu .
SFX 278 0 u .
SFX 279 Y 12
SFX 279 0 a .
SFX 279 0 ach .
SFX 279 0 am .
SFX 279 0 ami .
SFX 279 0 e .
SFX 279 0 eju .
SFX 279 0 i .
SFX 279 0 om .
SFX 279 0 oma .
SFX 279 0 ow .
SFX 279 0 owu .
SFX 279 0 u .
