ctranslate-ol/frontend/dictionaries/dsb_DE.dic
Babelsk/1,273
Bessarabsk/1,273
Bulgaŕsk/1,273
Cezarj/1,278
Chorwatsk/1,273
Engelsk/1,273
Frizisk/1,273
Głupskarj/1,278
Hannobersk/1,273
Indonezisk/1,273
Judsk/1,273
Kašubsk/1,273
Kružarj/1,278
Limborsk/1,273
Mecklenburgsk/1,273
Mohikanarj/1,278
Nisk/1,273
Polynezisk/1,273
Płomjenj/1,274
Radowašojcarj/1,278
Sicilisk/1,273
Tunezijarj/1,278
Walizisk/1,273
alfapromjenj/1,274
antiryśarj/1,278
baj/266
brěmjenj/1,274
charchl/1,259
chrjachl/1,258
chruchl/1,258
cytarj/1,278
de-facto-pśipóznaś/1,276
deltapromjenj/1,274
domkhyś/1,276
dosegnjenj/1,275
dołapu/1,260
drěś/277
dwaadwaźasć/1,249
dwanasć/1,247
dwaźasć/1,249
gammapromjenj/1,274
gatarj/1,278
gnerl/1,258
gnu/261
golfgraś/1,276
gregl/1,258
gromadu/261
gužl/1,258
hympl/1,258
iglu/261
imagetšuś/1,276
jadenadwaźasć/1,249
jadnasć/1,247
jangl/1,258
juchu/261
kaskozawěsćenj/1,275
katowarj/1,278
kašl/1,258
keźbu/261
komaděru/1,260
komažrěś/1,276
kowal/279
kradu/261
krekl/1,258
kuš/253
kwazl/1,258
kšajźu/261
lichomurjarj/1,278
lěšć/1,276
mroc/262
my/261
na-kśicu-biś/1,276
nachylu/261
nadejź/254
namšarj/1,278
napoj/263
narob/269
narownu/261
nasp/1,272
nata/1,260
natśas/268
nawjaś/277
nic/270
nj/1,246
njebubonaśenj/1,275
njedople/1,260
njedozaprěś/277
njedozn/1,272
njegóspoz/262
njejotěru/1,260
njekórknjenj/1,275
njemroc/262
njenadejź/254
njenakśěnow/269
njenalazu/1,260
njenanjerěš/268
njenasmjaś/277
njepódpacu/1,260
njepódrosć/254
njepódstśělenj/1,275
njepódup/269
njepójź/254
njepólaž/268
njepóplěś/277
njepósp/1,272
njepózjaw/269
njepśedkněž/262
njepśedłož/268
njepśelicu/1,260
njepśepiś/277
njepśewózowanj/1,275
njepśewłoc/268
njepśezn/1,272
njepśešćěp/269
njepśiwiś/277
njepśiłaz/262
njerozkup/269
njeroznos/268
njeschrop/269
njesfutru/1,260
njeskokanj/1,275
njeskšyś/277
njesn/1,272
njespójź/254
njewobkněž/262
njewobkšaw/269
njewobmóc/268
njewobsp/1,272
njewobuz/262
njewognaś/277
njewowalanj/1,275
njewugub/269
njewugórju/1,260
njewumuc/268
njewusc/262
njewutkaś/277
njewuzagadow/269
njewuzn/1,272
njewóspjetowanj/1,275
njewótkrotc/268
njewótlaś/277
njewóttupu/1,260
njewótzn/1,272
njewóznamjen/1,257
njezajź/254
njezakjandroz/268
njezamlaś/277
njezapšaw/269
njezaramikowanj/1,275
njezasp/1,272
njezasłuž/262
njezałož/268
njezejź/254
njezn/1,272
njeznjeglědałku/1,260
njezłož/268
njełuženj/1,275
onlinewudaś/1,276
pasl/1,258
prudl/1,258
pódnalěś/1,276
pódrosć/254
pódrěś/277
pójź/254
póklěc/267
pólažku/261
pómroc/267
pórownu/261
póspěš/267
póstarc/267
pótšub/269
pówaž/268
pówisku/1,260
pówóc/1,255
pózłośanj/1,275
pěś/251
pěśadwaźasć/1,249
pěśatśiźasć/1,249
pěśnasć/1,247
pěśźaseś/1,247
płac/265
pśedkněž/262
pśedmjenj/1,274
pśedwjasel/1,276
pśedznamjenj/1,274
pśeglědarj/1,278
pśerěš/268
pśesp/1,272
pśetoc/267
pśibraś/277
pśirěc/267
pśiznamjenj/1,274
pśiłaz/262
pśiłojenj/1,275
pšecweześ/1,276
ramjenj/1,274
rozjaw/269
rozklasku/1,260
rozproj/263
roztoc/267
rozzn/1,272
roždź/1,276
rubl/1,259
se/261
sebjepśiśpiś/1,276
sedymadwaźasć/1,249
sedymasedymźaseś/1,247
sedymnasć/1,247
sedymźaseś/1,247
skoku/261
slědkweześ/1,276
smasl/1,258
sobuskjaržbarj/1,278
sp/1,272
spokoj/263
spójź/254
stawjenj/1,274
stoc/267
stojecywóstaś/1,276
styriadwaźasć/1,249
styrnasć/1,247
styrźasć/1,249
swin/1,271
sćerpnjenj/1,275
trempl/1,258
ty/261
tś/1,250
tśeńtśl/1,258
tśiadwaźasć/1,249
tśinasć/1,247
tśiźasć/1,249
uv-promjenj/1,274
wingl/1,259
wobbiś/277
wobjes/268
wobkněž/262
wobmazow/269
wobwěncu/1,260
wobznamjen/1,257
wochylu/261
wokagnuś/1,276
wopjeršćen/1,257
wuboc/267
wubuš/267
wuglarj/1,278
wukórjen/1,257
wukśiw/269
wulibrowanj/1,275
wulic/267
wumjen/1,257
wumjenj/1,274
wusc/262
wusměš/267
wusp/1,272
wustarc/267
wušćěp/269
wuźaś/277
wóc/256
wósc/267
wósymadwaźasć/1,249
wósymnasć/1,247
wósymźaseś/1,247
wótchójźu/1,260
wótmatc/268
wótoc/267
wótpóškanj/1,275
wótsp/1,272
wóttoc/267
wóznamjen/1,257
zacl/1,272
zajměś/1,276
zajź/254
zakórjen/1,257
zamc/267
zapłomjen/1,257
zaryś/277
zasyp/252
zasłuž/262
zazn/1,272
zašwarcanj/1,275
zdźěs/268
zejź/254
zemle/1,260
znamjenj/1,274
zrub/252
zwóseb/269
zwěru/261
Łužycanarj/1,278
łdž/1,264
Šwedojsk/1,273
šapl/1,258
šesnasć/1,247
šesć/248
šesćadwaźasć/1,249
šesćźaseś/1,247
šybl/1,258
źaseś/248
źe/261
źewjeś/248
źewjeśadwaźasć/1,249
źewjeśnasć/1,247
źewjeśźaseś/1,247
